Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1563
Exempt wages; interstate business; violation; penalty.

Any persons, firm, company, corporation or business institution guilty of a violation of section 25-1560 or 25-1561, shall be liable to the party injured through such violation thereof for the amount of the debt sold, assigned, transferred, garnished or sued upon with all costs and expenses and reasonable attorney's fee, to be recovered in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state, and shall further be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1889, c. 25, § 4, p. 370;

R.S.1913, § 8110;

C.S.1922, § 9046;

C.S.1929, § 20-1564;

R.S.1943, § 25-1563;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 100.

Debtor, to claim benefit of act, must have residence in this state. Corliss v. Plano Mfg. Co., 80 Neb. 366, 114 N.W. 413 (1907).

Petition was sufficient to state cause of action under this section. Gordon Bros. v. Wageman, 77 Neb. 185, 108 N.W. 1067 (1906).

Section is constitutional; must allege plaintiff is head of family and wages are exempt. State ex rel. Green v. Power, 63 Neb. 496, 88 N.W. 769 (1902).